Mississippi, session 2026, SB2326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  For purposes of this section, the following words and terms shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Local law enforcement agency" means a county sheriff department or municipal police department. (b)  "Police officer" means a sworn member of a local law enforcement agency, which member or officer is assigned to patrol duties on public streets or highways. (c)  "Police pursuit" means an attempt by a police officer in an authorized emergency vehicle to apprehend any occupant of another moving motor vehicle, when the driver of the fleeing vehicle is attempting to avoid apprehension by maintaining or increasing the speed of such vehicle or by ignoring the police officer's attempt to stop such vehicle. (2)  No later than December 31, 2025, each local law enforcement agency shall develop and implement a written emergency vehicle response policy governing the procedures under which a police officer should initiate, continue and terminate a motor vehicle pursuit.  This policy may be the model policy endorsed by a national or state organization or association of chiefs of police or police officers. (3)  Each local law enforcement agency pursuit policy shall include, but not be limited to, the following procedural elements: (a)  The prohibition against initiating a pursuit where the police officer is pursuing a fleeing individual who has allegedly committed a misdemeanor offense or any felony offense, except where the fleeing individual has allegedly committed carjacking, murder, aggravated assault or robbery; (b)  Decision-making criteria or principles for initiation of pursuit.  These criteria or principles may include, but not be limited to: (i)  The potential for harm or immediate or potential danger to others if the fleeing individual or individuals escape; (ii)  The seriousness of the offense committed or believed to have been committed by the individual or individuals attempting to flee; (iii)  Safety factors that pose a risk to police officers, other motorists, pedestrians and other persons; (c)  Responsibilities of the pursuing officers; (d)  Responsibilities for the communications center of the local law enforcement agency; (e)  Responsibilities of the field supervisor; (f)  Traffic regulations during pursuit, including, but not limited to, the use of emergency equipment, audio signals and visual signals; (g)  Pursuit tactics; (h)  Roadblock usage; (i)  Communication and coordination of pursuit protocol for interjurisdictional pursuit; (j)  Decision-making criteria or principles for termination of pursuit.  These criteria or principles may include, but not be limited to, safety factors that pose a risk to police officers, other motorists, pedestrians and other persons; (k)  A pursuit may only proceed and continue into another political subdivision if there is an agreement with the other political subdivision that includes: (i)  The requirement to notify and the procedures to be used to notify the police department in such other political subdivision, or, if there is no organized police department in the other political subdivision, the officers responsible for law enforcement in such other political subdivision, that there is a pursuit in progress; and (ii)  The coordination and responsibility of supervisory personnel in each such political subdivision, and the police officer engaged in such pursuit; (l)  The type and amount of training in pursuits, that each police officer shall undergo, which may include training in vehicle simulators, if vehicle simulator training is determined to be necessary; and (m)  That a police officer immediately notify supervisory personnel or the officer-in-charge after the police officer begins a pursuit.  The chief of police or sheriff, shall inform each officer within such chief's or sheriff's department and each officer responsible for law enforcement in a political subdivision in which there is no such department of the existence of the policy of pursuit to be employed by any such officer and shall take whatever measures that are necessary to assure that each such officer understands the pursuit policy established. (4)  Any local law enforcement agency that fails to adopt the policy prescribed under subsection (3) of this section shall not be eligible for any state accreditation, and the board of supervisors of a county and the governing authorities of a municipality shall be subject to the withholding of certain allocations and payments. (5)  A copy of the local law enforcement agency's policy shall be filed with the Office of Standards and Training of the Department of Public Safety, and the agency shall update the filing whenever changes are adopted. (6)  Any local law enforcement agency may consult with the Office of Standards and Training for assistance in formulating the policy required under this section. SECTION 2.  It shall be the duty of the Office of Standards and Training of the Department of Public Safety to examine annually the books, records and other documents of each county and municipality and to perform such investigations as may be necessary to determine if a county or municipality has actually adopted and implemented a police pursuit policy as required under Section 1 of this act. If upon examination by the Department of Public Safety it is determined that a county or municipality is not in substantial compliance with the requirements under Section 1 of this act, the Department of Public Safety shall file a certified written notice with the clerk of the board of supervisors or the clerk of the municipality notifying the board of supervisors or governing authorities of a municipality, as the case may be, of the department's intention to issue a certificate of noncompliance to the Department of Revenue and to the Attorney General thirty (30) days immediately following the date of the filing of the notice unless within such period the county or municipality substantially complies with the requirements prescribed under Section 1 of this act.  If after thirty (30) days from the giving of the notice to the county or the municipality, in the opinion of the Director of the Office of Standards and Training of the Department of Public Safety, and the county or municipality has not substantially complied with the requirements described in Section 1 of this act, the Department of Public Safety shall issue a certificate of noncompliance to the board of supervisors or governing authorities of the municipality, Department of Revenue and the Attorney General.  Thereafter, the Department of Revenue shall withhold ten percent (10%) of the allocations and payments to the county that would otherwise be payable under Sections 27-5-101(b)(vi), 27-65-75(4) and 65-33-45, as well as the payments that would be due to the municipality as provided under Section 27-65-75(1)(a), as the case may be, until such time as the Department of Revenue and the Attorney General receive from the Department of Public Safety written notice of cancellation of the certificate of noncompliance. However, all of the funds that are withheld from the county or municipality, as the case may be, during the first ninety (90) days following issuance of a certificate of noncompliance under this subsection shall accrue to the account of that county or municipality and shall be subsequently allocated and paid to that county or municipality as otherwise provided by law if within such ninety-day period the board of supervisors or governing authorities of the municipality, the Department of Revenue and the Attorney General receive written notice from the Department of Public Safety of cancellation of the certificate of noncompliance.  The Department of Public Safety shall not unreasonably delay the issuance of a written notice of cancellation of a certificate of noncompliance but shall promptly issue a written notice of cancellation of certificate of noncompliance upon an affirmative showing by the county or municipality that it has come into substantial compliance.  If the Department of Pubic Safety has not issued a written notice of cancellation of the certificate of noncompliance within ninety (90) days after issuance of a certificate of noncompliance, all such funds as have been withheld and accrued to the county or municipality during such period, along with all monthly allocations which accrue but are withheld from the county or municipality following such ninety-day period for failure of the county or municipality to comply, shall be forfeited and reallocated among all other counties and municipalities in the state that are eligible for such funds in accordance with the same formula for calculating original allocations among counties and municipalities. There shall be no administrative appeal from any action of the Department of Public Safety under this subsection in issuing or failing to issue any certificate of noncompliance or notice of cancellation of a certificate of noncompliance; however, if a civil action is filed for and on behalf of any county or municipality which is aggrieved by any action of the Department of Public Safety under this section within ninety (90) days after issuance to the county or municipality of a certificate of noncompliance, any money as would otherwise be reallocated to other counties or municipalities under this section shall be held in escrow pending final determination of the civil action. SECTION 3.  Section 27-5-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [With regard to any county which is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:] 27-5-101.  Unless otherwise provided in this section, on or before the fifteenth day of each month, all gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes which are levied under the laws of this state and collected during the previous month shall be paid and apportioned by the Department of Revenue as follows: (a)  (i)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 31-17-127, from the gross amount of gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes produced by the state, there shall be deducted an amount equal to one-sixth (1/6) of principal and interest certified by the State Treasurer to the Department of Revenue to be due on the next semiannual bond and interest payment date, as required under the provisions of Chapter 130, Laws of 1938, and subsequent acts authorizing the issuance of bonds payable from gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene tax revenue on a parity with the bonds issued under authority of said Chapter 130.  The State Treasurer shall certify to the Department of Revenue on or before the fifteenth day of each month the amount to be paid to the "Highway Bonds Sinking Fund" as provided by said Chapter 130, Laws of 1938, and subsequent acts authorizing the issuance of bonds payable from gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene tax revenue, on a parity with the bonds issued under authority of said Chapter 130; and the Department of Revenue shall, on or before the twenty-fifth day of each month, pay into the State Treasury for credit to the "Highway Bonds Sinking Fund" the amount so certified to him by the State Treasurer due to be paid into such fund each month.  The payments to the "Highway Bonds Sinking Fund" shall be made out of gross gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene tax collections before deductions of any nature are considered; however, such payments shall be deducted from the allocation to the Mississippi Department of Transportation under paragraph (c) of this section. (ii)  From collections derived from the portion of the gasoline excise tax that exceeds Seven Cents (7¢) per gallon, up to and including Eighteen Cents (18¢) per gallon, from the portion of the tax on aviation gas under Section 27-55-11 that exceeds Six and Four-tenths Cents (6.4¢) per gallon, from the portion of the special fuel tax levied under Sections 27-55-519 and 27-55-521 that exceeds Ten Cents (10¢) per gallon, up to and including Eighteen Cents (18¢) per gallon, from the portion of the taxes levied under Section 27-55-519, at Five and Three-fourths Cents (5.75¢) per gallon that exceeds One Cent (1¢) per gallon on special fuel and Five and One-fourth Cents (5.25¢) per gallon on special fuel used as aircraft fuel, from the portion of the excise tax on compressed gas used as a motor fuel that exceeds the rate of tax in effect on June 30, 1987, and from the portion of the gasoline excise tax in excess of Seven Cents (7¢) per gallon and the diesel excise tax in excess of Ten Cents (10¢) per gallon under Section 27-61-5 there shall be deducted: 1.  An amount as provided in Section 27-65-75(4) to the credit of a special fund designated as the "Office of State Aid Road Construction." 2.  An amount equal to the tax collections derived from Two Cents (2¢) per gallon of the gasoline excise tax for distribution to the State Highway Fund to be used exclusively for the construction, reconstruction and maintenance of highways of the State of Mississippi or the payment of interest and principal on bonds when specifically authorized by the Legislature for that purpose. 3.  The balance shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the State Highway Fund. (iii)  From collections derived from the portion of the gasoline excise tax that exceeds Eighteen Cents (18¢) per gallon, and from the portion of the special fuel tax levied under Sections 27-55-519 and 27-55-521 that exceeds Eighteen Cents (18¢) per gallon, and from the portion of the gasoline excise tax and the diesel excise tax in excess of Eighteen Cents (18¢) per gallon under Section 27-61-5, there shall be deducted: 1.  Twenty-three and one-fourth percent (23.25%) of such amount to the credit of a special fund designated as the "Office of State Aid Road Construction." 2.  Two and three-fourths percent (2.75%) of such amount to the Strategic Multi-Modal Investments Fund created in Section 65-1-901. 3.  Seventy-four percent (74%) of such amount to the Mississippi Department of Transportation for constructing, maintaining or improving segments of highways and bridges under its jurisdiction, and for operational improvements on such segments, in accordance with a project schedule as reported in the three-year plan as adopted, amended by or reissued by the Mississippi Transportation Commission under Section 65-1-141. (b)  Subject to the provisions that said basis of distribution shall in nowise affect adversely the amount specifically pledged in paragraph (a) of this section to be paid into the "Highway Bonds Sinking Fund," the following shall be deducted from the amount produced by the state tax on gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene tax collections, excluding collections derived from the portion of the gasoline excise tax that exceeds Seven Cents (7¢) per gallon, from the portion of the tax on aviation gas under Section 27-55-11 that exceeds Six and Four-tenths Cents (6.4¢) per gallon, from the portion of the special fuel tax levied under Sections 27-55-519 and 27-55-521, at Eighteen Cents (18¢) per gallon that exceeds Ten Cents (10¢) per gallon, from the portion of the taxes levied under Section 27-55-519, at Five and Three-fourths Cents (5.75¢) per gallon that exceeds One Cent (1¢) per gallon on special fuel and Five and One-fourth Cents (5.25¢) per gallon on special fuel used as aircraft fuel, from the portion of the excise tax on compressed gas used as a motor fuel that exceeds the rate of tax in effect on June 30, 1987, and from the portion of the gasoline excise tax in excess of Seven Cents (7¢) per gallon and the diesel excise tax in excess of Ten Cents (10¢) per gallon under Section 27-61-5: (i)  Twenty percent (20%) of such amount which shall be earmarked and set aside for the construction, reconstruction and maintenance of the highways and roads of the state, provided that if such twenty percent (20%) should reduce any county to a lesser amount than that received in the fiscal year ending June 30, 1966, then such twenty percent (20%) shall be reduced to a percentage to provide that no county shall receive less than its portion for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1966; (ii)  The amount allowed as refund on gasoline or as tax credit on diesel fuel or kerosene used for agricultural, maritime, industrial, domestic, and nonhighway purposes; (iii)  Five percent (5%) of such amount shall be paid to the State Highway Fund; (iv)  The amount or portion thereof authorized by legislative appropriation to the Fisheries and Wildlife Fund created under Section 59-21-25; (v)  The amount for deposit into the special aviation fund under paragraph (d) of this section; and (vi)  The remainder shall be divided on a basis of nine-fourteenths (9/14) and five-fourteenths (5/14) (being the same basis as Four and One-half Cents (4-1/2¢) and Two and One-half Cents (2-1/2¢) is to Seven Cents (7¢) on gasoline, and six and forty-three one-hundredths (6.43) and three and fifty-seven one-hundredths (3.57) is to Ten Cents (10¢) on diesel fuel or kerosene).  The amount produced by the nine-fourteenths (9/14) division shall be allocated to the Department of Transportation and paid into the State Treasury as provided in this section and in Section 27-5-103 and the five-fourteenths (5/14) division shall be returned to the counties of the state, except as otherwise provided under Section 2 of this act, on the following basis: 1.  In each fiscal year, each county shall be paid each month the same percentage of the monthly total to be distributed as was paid to that county during the same month in the fiscal year which ended April 9, 1960, until the county receives One Hundred Ninety Thousand Dollars ($190,000.00) in such fiscal year, at which time funds shall be distributed under the provisions of paragraph (b)(vi)4 of this section. 2.  If after payments in 1 above, any county has not received a total of One Hundred Ninety Thousand Dollars ($190,000.00) at the end of the fiscal year ending June 30, 1961, and each fiscal year thereafter, then any available funds not distributed under 1 above shall be used to bring such county or counties up to One Hundred Ninety Thousand Dollars ($190,000.00) or such funds shall be divided equally among such counties not reaching One Hundred Ninety Thousand Dollars ($190,000.00) if there is not sufficient money to bring all the counties to said One Hundred Ninety Thousand Dollars ($190,000.00). 3.  When a county has been paid an amount equal to the total which was paid to the same county during the fiscal year ended April 9, 1960, such county shall receive no further payments during the then current fiscal year until the last month of such current fiscal year, at which time distribution will be made under 2 above, except as set out in 4 below. 4.  During the last month of the current fiscal year, should it be determined that there are funds available in excess of the amount distributed for the year under 1 and 2 above, then such excess funds shall be distributed among the various counties as follows: One-third (1/3) of such excess to be divided equally among the counties; One-third (1/3) of such excess to be paid to the counties in the proportion which the population of each county bears to the total population of the state according to the last federal census; One-third (1/3) of such excess to be paid to the counties in the proportion which the number of square miles of each county bears to the total square miles in the state. 5.  It is the declared purpose and intent of the Legislature that no county shall be paid less than was paid during the year ended April 9, 1960, unless the amount to be distributed to all counties in any year is less than the amount distributed to all counties during the year ended April 9, 1960. The Municipal Aid Fund as established by Section 27-5-103 shall not participate in any portion of any funds allocated to any county hereunder over and above One Hundred Ninety Thousand Dollars ($190,000.00). In any county having countywide road or bridge bonds, or supervisors district or district road or bridge bonds outstanding, which exceed, in the aggregate, twelve percent (12%) of the assessed valuation of the taxable property of the county or district, it shall be the duty of the board of supervisors to set aside not less than sixty percent (60%) of such county's share or district's share of the gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes to be used in paying the principal and interest on such road or bridge bonds as they mature. In any county having such countywide road or bridge bonds or district road or bridge bonds outstanding which exceed, in the aggregate, eight percent (8%) of the assessed valuation of the taxable property of the county, but which do not exceed, in the aggregate, twelve percent (12%) of the assessed valuation of the taxable property of the county, it shall be the duty of the board of supervisors to set aside not less than thirty-five percent (35%) of such county's share of the gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes to be used in paying the principal and interest of such road or bridge bonds as they mature. In any county having such countywide road or bridge bonds or district road or bridge bonds outstanding which exceed, in the aggregate, five percent (5%) of the assessed valuation of the taxable property of the county, but which do not exceed, in the aggregate, eight percent (8%) of the assessed valuation of the taxable property of the county, it shall be the duty of the board of supervisors to set aside not less than twenty percent (20%) of such county's share of the gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes to be used in paying the principal and interest of such road and bridge bonds as they mature. In any county having such countywide road or bridge bonds or district road or bridge bonds outstanding which do not exceed, in the aggregate, five percent (5%) of the assessed valuation of the taxable property of the county, it shall be the duty of the board of supervisors to set aside not less than ten percent (10%) of such county's share of the gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes to be used in paying the principal and interest on such road or bridge bonds as they mature. The portion of any such county's share of the gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes thus set aside for the payment of the principal and interest of road or bridge bonds, as provided for in this section, shall be used first in paying the currently maturing installments of the principal and interest of such countywide road or bridge bonds, if there be any such countywide road or bridge bonds outstanding, and secondly, in paying the currently maturing installments of principal and interest of district road or bridge bonds outstanding.  It shall be the duty of the board of supervisors to pay bonds and interest maturing in each supervisors district out of the supervisors district's share of the gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes of such district. The remaining portion of such county's share of the gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes, after setting aside the portion above provided for the payment of the principal and interest of bonds, shall be used in the construction and maintenance of any public highways, bridges, or culverts of the county, including the roads in special or separate road districts, in the discretion of the board of supervisors, or in paying the interest and principal of county road and bridge bonds or district road and bridge bonds, in the discretion of the board of supervisors. In any county having no countywide road or bridge bonds or district road or bridge bonds outstanding, all such county's share of the gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes shall be used in the construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of the public highways, bridges, or culverts of the county as the board of supervisors may determine. In every county in which there are county road bonds or seawall or road protection bonds outstanding which were issued for the purpose of building bridges or constructing public roads or seawalls, such funds shall be used in the manner provided by law. (c)  From the amount produced by the nine-fourteenths (9/14) division allocated to the Department of Transportation, there shall be deducted: (i)  The amount paid to the State Treasurer for the "Highway Bonds Sinking Fund" under paragraph (a) of this section; (ii)  Any amounts due counties in accordance with Section 65-33-45 which have outstanding bonds issued for seawall or road protection purposes, issued under provisions of Chapter 319, Laws of 1924, and amendments thereto; (iii)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 31-17-127, the remainder shall be paid by the Department of Revenue to the State Treasurer on the fifteenth day of each month next succeeding the month in which the gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes were collected to the credit of the State Highway Fund. The funds allocated for the construction, reconstruction, and improvement of state highways, bridges, and culverts, or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall first be used in conjunction with funds supplied by the federal government for such purposes and allocated to the Department of Transportation to be expended on the state highway system.  It is specifically provided hereby that the necessary portion of such funds hereinabove allocated to the Department of Transportation may be used for the prompt payment of principal and interest on highway bonds heretofore issued, including such bonds issued or to be issued under the provisions of Chapter 312, Laws of 1956, and amendments thereto. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to reduce the amount of such gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene excise taxes levied by the state, allotted under the provisions of Title 65, Chapter 33, Mississippi Code of 1972, to counties in which there are outstanding bonds issued for seawall or road protection purposes issued under the provisions of Chapter 319, Laws of 1924, and amendments thereto; the amount of said gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene excise taxes designated in this section for the payment of bonds and interest authorized and issued or to be issued under the provisions of Chapter 130, Laws of 1938, and subsequent acts authorizing the issuance of bonds payable from gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene tax revenue, shall, in such counties, be considered as being paid "into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Highway Fund" within the meaning of Section 65-33-45 in computing the amount to be paid to such counties under the provisions of said section, and this section shall be administered in connection with Title 65, Chapter 33, Mississippi Code of 1972, and Sections 65-33-45, 65-33-47 and 65-33-49 dealing with seawalls, as if made a part of this section. (d)  The proceeds of the Five and One-fourth Cents (5.25¢) of the tax per gallon on oils used as a propellant for jet aircraft engines, and Six and Four-tenths Cents (6.4¢) of the tax per gallon on aviation gasoline and the tax of One Cent (1¢) per gallon for each gallon of gasoline for which a refund has been made pursuant to Section 27-55-23 because such gasoline was used for aviation purposes, shall be paid to the State Treasury into a special fund to be used exclusively, pursuant to legislative appropriation, for the support and development of aeronautics as defined in Section 61-1-3. (e)  State highway funds in an amount equal to the difference between Forty-two Million Dollars ($42,000,000.00) and the annual debt service payable on the state's highway revenue refunding bonds, Series 1985, shall be expended for the construction or reconstruction of highways designated under the highway program created under Section 65-3-97. (f)  "Gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes" as used in this section shall be deemed to mean and include state gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes levied and imposed on distributors of gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene, and all state excise taxes derived from any fuel used to propel vehicles upon the highways of this state, when levied by any statute. [With regard to any county which is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:] 27-5-101.  Unless otherwise provided in this section, on or before the fifteenth day of each month, all gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes which are levied under the laws of this state and collected during the previous month shall be paid and apportioned by the Department of Revenue as follows: (a)  (i)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 31-17-127, from the gross amount of gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes produced by the state, there shall be deducted an amount equal to one-sixth (1/6) of principal and interest certified by the State Treasurer to the Department of Revenue to be due on the next semiannual bond and interest payment date, as required under the provisions of Chapter 130, Laws of 1938, and subsequent acts authorizing the issuance of bonds payable from gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene tax revenue on a parity with the bonds issued under authority of said Chapter 130.  The State Treasurer shall certify to the Department of Revenue on or before the fifteenth day of each month the amount to be paid to the "Highway Bonds Sinking Fund" as provided by said Chapter 130, Laws of 1938, and subsequent acts authorizing the issuance of bonds payable from gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene tax revenue, on a parity with the bonds issued under authority of said Chapter 130; and the Department of Revenue shall, on or before the twenty-fifth day of each month, pay into the State Treasury for credit to the "Highway Bonds Sinking Fund" the amount so certified to him by the State Treasurer due to be paid into such fund each month.  The payments to the "Highway Bonds Sinking Fund" shall be made out of gross gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene tax collections before deductions of any nature are considered; however, such payments shall be deducted from the allocation to the Department of Transportation under paragraph (c) of this section. (ii)  From collections derived from the portion of the gasoline excise tax that exceeds Seven Cents (7¢) per gallon, up to and including Eighteen Cents (18¢) per gallon, from the portion of the tax on aviation gas under Section 27-55-11 that exceeds Six and Four-tenths Cents (6.4¢) per gallon, from the portion of the special fuel tax levied under Sections 27-55-519 and 27-55-521 that exceeds Ten Cents (10¢) per gallon, up to and including Eighteen Cents (18¢) per gallon, from the portion of the taxes levied under Section 27-55-519, at Five and Three-fourths Cents (5.75¢) per gallon that exceeds One Cent (1¢) per gallon on special fuel and Five and One-fourth Cents (5.25¢) per gallon on special fuel used as aircraft fuel, from the portion of the excise tax on compressed gas used as a motor fuel that exceeds the rate of tax in effect on June 30, 1987, and from the portion of the gasoline excise tax in excess of Seven Cents (7¢) per gallon and the diesel excise tax in excess of Ten Cents (10¢) per gallon under Section 27-61-5 there shall be deducted: 1.  An amount as provided in Section 27-65-75(4) to the credit of a special fund designated as the "Office of State Aid Road Construction." 2.  An amount equal to the tax collections derived from Two Cents (2¢) per gallon of the gasoline excise tax for distribution to the State Highway Fund to be used exclusively for the construction, reconstruction and maintenance of highways of the State of Mississippi or the payment of interest and principal on bonds when specifically authorized by the Legislature for that purpose. 3.  The balance shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the State Highway Fund. (iii)  From collections derived from the portion of the gasoline excise tax that exceeds Eighteen Cents (18¢) per gallon, and from the portion of the special fuel tax levied under Sections 27-55-519 and 27-55-521 that exceeds Eighteen Cents (18¢) per gallon, and from the portion of the gasoline excise tax and the diesel excise tax in excess of Eighteen Cents (18¢) per gallon under Section 27-61-5, there shall be deducted: 1.  Twenty-three and one-fourth percent (23.25%) of such amount to the credit of a special fund designated as the "Office of State Aid Road Construction." 2.  Two and three-fourths percent (2.75%) of such amount to the Strategic Multi-Modal Investments Fund created in Section 65-1-901. 3.  Seventy-four percent (74%) of such amount to the Mississippi Department of Transportation for constructing, maintaining or improving segments of highways and bridges under its jurisdiction, and for operational improvements on such segments, in accordance with a project schedule as reported in the three-year plan as adopted, amended by or reissued by the Mississippi Transportation Commission under Section 65-1-141. (b)  Subject to the provisions that said basis of distribution shall in nowise affect adversely the amount specifically pledged in paragraph (a) of this section to be paid into the "Highway Bonds Sinking Fund," the following shall be deducted from the amount produced by the state tax on gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene tax collections, excluding collections derived from the portion of the gasoline excise tax that exceeds Seven Cents (7¢) per gallon, from the portion of the tax on aviation gas under Section 27-55-11 that exceeds Six and Four-tenths Cents (6.4¢) per gallon, from the portion of the special fuel tax levied under Sections 27-55-519 and 27-55-521, at Eighteen Cents (18¢) per gallon, that exceeds Ten Cents (10¢) per gallon, from the portion of the taxes levied under Section 27-55-519, at Five and Three-fourths Cents (5.75¢) that exceeds One Cent (1¢) per gallon on special fuel and Five and One-fourth Cents (5.25¢) per gallon on special fuel used as aircraft fuel, from the portion of the excise tax on compressed gas used as a motor fuel that exceeds the rate of tax in effect on June 30, 1987, and from the portion of the gasoline excise tax in excess of Seven Cents (7¢) per gallon and the diesel excise tax in excess of Ten Cents (10¢) per gallon under Section 27-61-5: (i)  Twenty percent (20%) of such amount which shall be earmarked and set aside for the construction, reconstruction and maintenance of the highways and roads of the state, provided that if such twenty percent (20%) should reduce any county to a lesser amount than that received in the fiscal year ending June 30, 1966, then such twenty percent (20%) shall be reduced to a percentage to provide that no county shall receive less than its portion for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1966; (ii)  The amount allowed as refund on gasoline or as tax credit on diesel fuel or kerosene used for agricultural, maritime, industrial, domestic and nonhighway purposes; (iii)  Five percent (5%) of such amount shall be paid to the State Highway Fund; (iv)  The amount or portion thereof authorized by legislative appropriation to the Fisheries and Wildlife Fund created under Section 59-21-25; (v)  The amount for deposit into the special aviation fund under paragraph (d) of this section; and (vi)  The remainder shall be divided on a basis of nine-fourteenths (9/14) and five-fourteenths (5/14) (being the same basis as Four and One-half Cents (4-1/2¢) and Two and One-half Cents (2-1/2¢) is to Seven Cents (7¢) on gasoline, and six and forty-three one-hundredths (6.43) and three and fifty-seven one-hundredths (3.57) is to Ten Cents (10¢) on diesel fuel or kerosene).  The amount produced by the nine-fourteenths (9/14) division shall be allocated to the Department of Transportation and paid into the State Treasury as provided in this section and in Section 27-5-103 and the five-fourteenths (5/14) division shall be returned to the counties of the state, except as otherwise provided under Section 2 of this act, on the following basis: 1.  In each fiscal year, each county shall be paid each month the same percentage of the monthly total to be distributed as was paid to that county during the same month in the fiscal year which ended April 9, 1960, until the county receives One Hundred Ninety Thousand Dollars ($190,000.00) in such fiscal year, at which time funds shall be distributed under the provisions of paragraph (b)(vi)4 of this section. 2.  If after payments in 1 above, any county has not received a total of One Hundred Ninety Thousand Dollars ($190,000.00) at the end of the fiscal year ending June 30, 1961, and each fiscal year thereafter, then any available funds not distributed under 1 above shall be used to bring such county or counties up to One Hundred Ninety Thousand Dollars ($190,000.00) or such funds shall be divided equally among such counties not reaching One Hundred Ninety Thousand Dollars ($190,000.00) if there is not sufficient money to bring all the counties to said One Hundred Ninety Thousand Dollars ($190,000.00). 3.  When a county has been paid an amount equal to the total which was paid to the same county during the fiscal year ended April 9, 1960, such county shall receive no further payments during the then current fiscal year until the last month of such current fiscal year, at which time distribution will be made under 2 above, except as set out in 4 below. 4.  During the last month of the current fiscal year, should it be determined that there are funds available in excess of the amount distributed for the year under 1 and 2 above, then such excess funds shall be distributed among the various counties as follows: One-third (1/3) of such excess to be divided equally among the counties; One-third (1/3) of such excess to be paid to the counties in the proportion which the population of each county bears to the total population of the state according to the last federal census; One-third (1/3) of such excess to be paid to the counties in the proportion which the number of square miles of each county bears to the total square miles in the state. 5.  It is the declared purpose and intent of the Legislature that no county shall be paid less than was paid during the year ended April 9, 1960, unless the amount to be distributed to all counties in any year is less than the amount distributed to all counties during the year ended April 9, 1960. The Municipal Aid Fund as established by Section 27-5-103 shall not participate in any portion of any funds allocated to any county hereunder over and above One Hundred Ninety Thousand Dollars ($190,000.00). In any county having road or bridge bonds outstanding which exceed, in the aggregate, twelve percent (12%) of the assessed valuation of the taxable property of the county, it shall be the duty of the board of supervisors to set aside not less than sixty percent (60%) of such county's share of the gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes to be used in paying the principal and interest on such road or bridge bonds as they mature. In any county having such road or bridge bonds outstanding which exceed, in the aggregate, eight percent (8%) of the assessed valuation of the taxable property of the county, but which do not exceed, in the aggregate, twelve percent (12%) of the assessed valuation of the taxable property of the county, it shall be the duty of the board of supervisors to set aside not less than thirty-five percent (35%) of such county's share of the gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes to be used in paying the principal and interest of such road or bridge bonds as they mature. In any county having such road or bridge bonds outstanding which exceed, in the aggregate, five percent (5%) of the assessed valuation of the taxable property of the county, but which do not exceed, in the aggregate, eight percent (8%) of the assessed valuation of the taxable property of the county, it shall be the duty of the board of supervisors to set aside not less than twenty percent (20%) of such county's share of the gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes to be used in paying the principal and interest of such road and bridge bonds as they mature. In any county having such road or bridge bonds outstanding which do not exceed, in the aggregate, five percent (5%) of the assessed valuation of the taxable property of the county, it shall be the duty of the board of supervisors to set aside not less than ten percent (10%) of such county's share of the gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes to be used in paying the principal and interest on such road or bridge bonds as they mature. The portion of any such county's share of the gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes thus set aside for the payment of the principal and interest of road or bridge bonds, as provided for in this section, shall be used in paying the currently maturing installments of the principal and interest of such road or bridge bonds, if there be any such road or bridge bonds outstanding. The remaining portion of such county's share of the gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes, after setting aside the portion above provided for the payment of the principal and interest of bonds, shall be used in the construction and maintenance of any public highways, bridges or culverts of the county, in the discretion of the board of supervisors. In any county having no road or bridge bonds outstanding, all such county's share of the gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes shall be used in the construction, reconstruction and maintenance of the public highways, bridges or culverts of the county, as the board of supervisors may determine. In every county in which there are county road bonds or seawall or road protection bonds outstanding which were issued for the purpose of building bridges or constructing public roads or seawalls, such funds shall be used in the manner provided by law. (c)  From the amount produced by the nine-fourteenths (9/14) division allocated to the Department of Transportation, there shall be deducted: (i)  The amount paid to the State Treasurer for the "Highway Bonds Sinking Fund" under paragraph (a) of this section; (ii)  Any amounts due counties in accordance with Section 65-33-45 which have outstanding bonds issued for seawall or road protection purposes, issued under provisions of Chapter 319, Laws of 1924, and amendments thereto; and (iii)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 31-17-127, the remainder shall be paid by the Department of Revenue to the State Treasurer on the fifteenth day of each month next succeeding the month in which the gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes were collected to the credit of the State Highway Fund. The funds allocated for the construction, reconstruction and improvement of state highways, bridges and culverts, or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall first be used in conjunction with funds supplied by the federal government for such purposes and allocated to the Department of Transportation to be expended on the state highway system.  It is specifically provided hereby that the necessary portion of such funds hereinabove allocated to the Department of Transportation may be used for the prompt payment of principal and interest on highway bonds heretofore issued, including such bonds issued or to be issued under the provisions of Chapter 312, Laws of 1956, and amendments thereto. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to reduce the amount of such gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene excise taxes levied by the state, allotted under the provisions of Title 65, Chapter 33, Mississippi Code of 1972, to counties in which there are outstanding bonds issued for seawall or road protection purposes issued under the provisions of Chapter 319, Laws of 1924, and amendments thereto; the amount of said gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene excise taxes designated in this section for the payment of bonds and interest authorized and issued or to be issued under the provisions of Chapter 130, Laws of 1938, and subsequent acts authorizing the issuance of bonds payable from gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene tax revenue, shall, in such counties, be considered as being paid "into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Highway Fund" within the meaning of Section 65-33-45 in computing the amount to be paid to such counties under the provisions of said section, and this section shall be administered in connection with Title 65, Chapter 33, Mississippi Code of 1972, and Sections 65-33-45, 65-33-47 and 65-33-49 dealing with seawalls, as if made a part of this section. (d)  The proceeds of the Five and One-fourth Cents (5.25¢) of the tax per gallon on oils used as a propellant for jet aircraft engines, and Six and Four-tenths Cents (6.4¢) of the tax per gallon on aviation gasoline and the tax of One Cent (1¢) per gallon for each gallon of gasoline for which a refund has been made pursuant to Section 27-55-23 because such gasoline was used for aviation purposes, shall be paid to the State Treasury into a special fund to be used exclusively, pursuant to legislative appropriation, for the support and development of aeronautics as defined in Section 61-1-3. (e)  State highway funds in an amount equal to the difference between Forty-two Million Dollars ($42,000,000.00) and the annual debt service payable on the state's highway revenue refunding bonds, Series 1985, shall be expended for the construction or reconstruction of highways designated under the highway program created under Section 65-3-97. (f)  "Gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes" as used in this section shall be deemed to mean and include state gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes levied and imposed on distributors of gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene, and all state excise taxes derived from any fuel used to propel vehicles upon the highways of this state, when levied by any statute. SECTION 4.  Section 27-65-75, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-65-75.  On or before the fifteenth day of each month, the revenue collected under the provisions of this chapter during the preceding month shall be paid and distributed as follows: (1)  (a)  On or before August 15, 1992, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 1993, eighteen percent (18%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities within a municipal corporation shall be allocated for distribution to the municipality and paid to the municipal corporation.  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (a), on or before August 15, 1993, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, eighteen and one-half percent (18-1/2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within a municipal corporation shall be allocated for distribution to the municipality and paid to the municipal corporation.  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (a), on or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighteen and one-half percent (18.5%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-17(1)(n), 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within a municipal corporation shall be allocated for distribution and paid to the municipal corporation.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, twenty-five and nine-tenths percent (25.9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) on business activities within a municipal corporation shall be allocated for distribution and paid to the municipal corporation.  However, in the event the State Auditor issues a certificate of noncompliance pursuant to Section 21-35-31, the department shall withhold ten percent (10%) of the allocations and payments to the municipality that would otherwise be payable to the municipality under this paragraph (a) until such time that the department receives written notice of the cancellation of a certificate of noncompliance from the State Auditor.  If the Department of Public Safety issues a certificate of noncompliance pursuant to Section 2 of this act, the Department of Revenue shall withhold ten percent (10%) of the allocations and payment to the municipality that would otherwise be payable to the municipality under this paragraph (a) until such time that the department receives written notice of the cancellation of a certificate of noncompliance from the Department of Public Safety. A municipal corporation, for the purpose of distributing the tax under this subsection, shall mean and include all incorporated cities, towns and villages. Monies allocated for distribution and credited to a municipal corporation under this paragraph may be pledged as security for a loan if the distribution received by the municipal corporation is otherwise authorized or required by law to be pledged as security for such a loan. In any county having a county seat that is not an incorporated municipality, the distribution provided under this subsection shall be made as though the county seat was an incorporated municipality; however, the distribution to the municipality shall be paid to the county treasury in which the municipality is located, and those funds shall be used for road, bridge and street construction or maintenance in the county. (b)  On or before August 15, 2006, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, eighteen and one-half percent (18-1/2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities on the campus of a state institution of higher learning or community or junior college whose campus is not located within the corporate limits of a municipality, shall be allocated for distribution to the state institution of higher learning or community or junior college and paid to the state institution of higher learning or community or junior college.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighteen and one-half percent (18.5%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-17(1)(n), 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities on the campus of a state institution of higher learning or community or junior college whose campus is not located within the corporate limits of a municipality, shall be allocated for distribution and paid to the state institution of higher learning or community or junior college.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, twenty-five and nine-tenths percent (25.9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) on business activities on the campus of a state institution of higher learning or community or junior college whose campus is not located within the corporate limits of a municipality, shall be allocated for distribution and paid to the state institution of higher learning or community or junior college. (c)  On or before August 15, 2018, and each succeeding month thereafter until August 14, 2019, two percent (2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 29-5-215.  On or before August 15, 2019, and each succeeding month thereafter until August 14, 2020, four percent (4%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 29-5-215.  On or before August 15, 2020, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2023, six percent (6%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 29-5-215.  On or before August 15, 2023, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, nine percent (9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 29-5-215.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, nine percent (9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-17(1)(n), 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 27-5-215.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, twelve and six-tenths percent (12.6%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 27-5-215. (d)  (i)  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (d), on or before the fifteenth day of the month that the diversion authorized by this section begins, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighteen and one-half percent (18-1/2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities within a redevelopment project area developed under a redevelopment plan adopted under the Tax Increment Financing Act (Section 21-45-1 et seq.) shall be allocated for distribution to the county in which the project area is located if: 1.  The county: a. Borders on the Mississippi Sound and the State of Alabama, or b.  Is Harrison County, Mississippi, and the project area is within a radius of two (2) miles from the intersection of Interstate 10 and Menge Avenue; 2.  The county has issued bonds under Section 21-45-9 to finance all or a portion of a redevelopment project in the redevelopment project area; 3.  Any debt service for the indebtedness incurred is outstanding; and 4.  A development with a value of Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) or more is, or will be, located in the redevelopment area. (ii)  For a county that is eligible to receive funds under this paragraph (d), as determined by the department under this paragraph (d), from and after September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighteen and one-half percent (18.5%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-17(1)(n), 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities within a redevelopment project area developed under a redevelopment plan adopted under the Tax Increment Financing Act (Section 21-45-1 et seq.) shall be allocated for distribution to the county in which the project is located, and twenty-five and nine-tenths percent (25.9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) shall be allocated for distribution to that county. (iii)  Before any sales tax revenue may be allocated for distribution to a county under this paragraph (d), the county shall certify to the Department of Revenue that the requirements of this paragraph (d) have been met, the amount of bonded indebtedness that has been incurred by the county for the redevelopment project and the expected date the indebtedness incurred by the county will be satisfied. (iv)  The diversion of sales tax revenue authorized by this paragraph (d) shall begin the month following the month in which the Department of Revenue determines that the requirements of this paragraph (d) have been met.  The diversion shall end the month the indebtedness incurred by the county is satisfied.  All revenue received by the county under this paragraph (d) shall be deposited in the fund required to be created in the tax increment financing plan under Section 21-45-11 and be utilized solely to satisfy the indebtedness incurred by the county. (2)  On or before September 15, 1987, and each succeeding month thereafter, from the revenue collected under this chapter during the preceding month, One Million One Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($1,125,000.00) shall be allocated for distribution to municipal corporations as defined under subsection (1) of this section in the proportion that the number of gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold by distributors to consumers and retailers in each such municipality during the preceding fiscal year bears to the total gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold by distributors to consumers and retailers in municipalities statewide during the preceding fiscal year.  The Department of Revenue shall require all distributors of gasoline and diesel fuel to report to the department monthly the total number of gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold by them to consumers and retailers in each municipality during the preceding month.  The Department of Revenue shall have the authority to promulgate such rules and regulations as is necessary to determine the number of gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold by distributors to consumers and retailers in each municipality.  In determining the percentage allocation of funds under this subsection for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1987, and ending June 30, 1988, the Department of Revenue may consider gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold for a period of less than one (1) fiscal year. For the purposes of this subsection, the term "fiscal year" means the fiscal year beginning July 1 of a year. (3)  On or before September 15, 1987, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month, until the date specified in Section 65-39-35, the proceeds derived from contractors' taxes levied under Section 27-65-21 on contracts for the construction or reconstruction of highways designated under the highway program created under Section 65-3-97 shall, except as otherwise provided in Section 31-17-127, be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Highway Fund to be used to fund that highway program.  The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall provide to the Department of Revenue such information as is necessary to determine the amount of proceeds to be distributed under this subsection. (4)  On or before August 15, 1994, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month through July 15, 1999, from the proceeds of gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes as provided in Section 27-5-101(a)(ii)1, Four Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00) shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of a special fund designated as the "State Aid Road Fund," created by Section 65-9-17.  On or before August 15, 1999, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month through August 15, 2026, from the total amount of the proceeds of gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes apportioned by Section 27-5-101(a)(ii)1, Four Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00) or an amount equal to twenty-three and one-fourth percent (23-1/4%) of those funds, whichever is the greater amount, shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the "State Aid Road Fund," created by Section 65-9-17.  After August 15, 2025, from the total amount of the proceeds of gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes apportioned by Section 27-5-101(a)(ii)1 and (iii), Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) or an amount equal to twenty-three and one-fourth percent (23-1/4%) of those funds, whichever is greater, shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the "State Aid Road Fund" on or before September 15, 2025, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month through August 15, 2026, and Six Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($6,500,000.00) or an amount equal to twenty-three and one-fourth percent (23-1/4%) of those funds, whichever is greater, shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the "State Aid Road Fund" on or before September 15, 2026, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month through August 15, 2027, and Eight Million Dollars ($8,000,000.00) or an amount equal to twenty-three and one-fourth percent (23-1/4%) of those funds, whichever is greater, shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the "State Aid Road Fund" on or before September 15, 2027, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month.  From the amount of taxes paid into the special fund under this subsection and subsection (9) of this section, there shall be first deducted and paid the amount necessary to pay the expenses of the Office of State Aid Road Construction, as authorized by the Legislature for all other general and special fund agencies.  The remainder of the funds shall be allocated monthly to the several counties in accordance with the following formula: (a)  One-third (1/3) shall be allocated to all counties in equal shares; (b)  One-third (1/3) shall be allocated to counties based on the proportion that the total number of rural road miles in a county bears to the total number of rural road miles in all counties of the state; and (c)  One-third (1/3) shall be allocated to counties based on the proportion that the rural population of the county bears to the total rural population in all counties of the state, according to the latest federal decennial census. For the purposes of this subsection, the term "gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes" means such taxes as defined in paragraph (f) of Section 27-5-101. The amount of funds allocated to any county under this subsection for any fiscal year after fiscal year 1994 shall not be less than the amount allocated to the county for fiscal year 1994. Any reference in the general laws of this state or the Mississippi Code of 1972 to Section 27-5-105 shall mean and be construed to refer and apply to subsection (4) of Section 27-65-75. (5)  On or before August 15, 2024, and each succeeding month thereafter, One Million Six Hundred Sixty-six Thousand Six Hundred Sixty-six Dollars ($1,666,666.00) shall be paid into the special fund known as the Education Enhancement Fund created and existing under the provisions of Section 37-61-33. (6)  An amount each month beginning August 15, 1983, through November 15, 1986, as specified in Section 6, Chapter 542, Laws of 1983, shall be paid into the special fund known as the Correctional Facilities Construction Fund created in Section 6, Chapter 542, Laws of 1983. (7)  On or before August 15, 1992, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2000, two and two hundred sixty-six one-thousandths percent (2.266%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(2), shall be deposited by the department into the School Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund created under Section 37-61-35.  On or before August 15, 2000, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, two and two hundred sixty-six one-thousandths percent (2.266%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(2), shall be deposited into the School Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund created under Section 37-61-35 until such time that the total amount deposited into the fund during a fiscal year equals Forty-two Million Dollars ($42,000,000.00).  Thereafter, the amounts diverted under this subsection (7) during the fiscal year in excess of Forty-two Million Dollars ($42,000,000.00) shall be deposited into the Education Enhancement Fund created under Section 37-61-33 for appropriation by the Legislature as other education needs and shall not be subject to the percentage appropriation requirements set forth in Section 37-61-33.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, two and two hundred sixty-six one-thousandths percent (2.266%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) and (2), and three and seventeen one-hundredths percent (3.17%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n), shall be deposited into the School Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund created under Section 37-61-35 until such time that the total amount deposited into the fund during a fiscal year equals Forty-two Million Dollars ($42,000,000.00).  Thereafter, the amounts diverted under this subsection (7) during the fiscal year in excess of Forty-two Million Dollars ($42,000,000.00) shall be deposited into the Education Enhancement Fund created under Section 37-61-33 for appropriation by the Legislature as other education needs and shall not be subject to the percentage appropriation requirements set forth in Section 37-61-33. (8)  On or before August 15, 1992, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, nine and seventy-three one-thousandths percent (9.073%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(2), shall be deposited into the Education Enhancement Fund created under Section 37-61-33.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, nine and seventy-three one-thousandths percent (9.073%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) and (2), and twelve and seven-tenths percent (12.7%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n), shall be deposited into the Education Enhancement Fund created under Section 37-61-33. (9)  On or before August 15, 1994, and each succeeding month thereafter, from the revenue collected under this chapter during the preceding month, Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) shall be paid into the State Aid Road Fund. (10)  On or before August 15, 1994, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 1995, from the revenue collected under this chapter during the preceding month, Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) shall be deposited into the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-51-105. (11)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before February 15, 1995, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(2) and the corresponding levy in Section 27-65-23 on the rental or lease of private carriers of passengers and light carriers of property as defined in Section 27-51-101 shall be deposited, without diversion, into the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-51-105. (12)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before August 15, 1995, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(1) on retail sales of private carriers of passengers and light carriers of property, as defined in Section 27-51-101 and the corresponding levy in Section 27-65-23 on the rental or lease of these vehicles, shall be deposited, after diversion, into the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-51-105. (13)  On or before July 15, 1994, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month thereafter, that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-22 that is derived from activities held on the Mississippi State Fairgrounds Complex shall be paid into a special fund that is created in the State Treasury and shall be expended upon legislative appropriation solely to defray the costs of repairs and renovation at the Trade Mart and Coliseum. (14)  On or before August 15, 1998, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2005, that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-23 that is derived from sales by cotton compresses or cotton warehouses and that would otherwise be paid into the General Fund shall be deposited in an amount not to exceed Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) into the special fund created under Section 69-37-39. On or before August 15, 2007, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2010, that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-23 that is derived from sales by cotton compresses or cotton warehouses and that would otherwise be paid into the General Fund shall be deposited in an amount not to exceed Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) into the special fund created under Section 69-37-39 until all debts or other obligations incurred by the Certified Cotton Growers Organization under the Mississippi Boll Weevil Management Act before January 1, 2007, are satisfied in full.  On or before August 15, 2010, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2011, fifty percent (50%) of that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-23 that is derived from sales by cotton compresses or cotton warehouses and that would otherwise be paid into the General Fund shall be deposited into the special fund created under Section 69-37-39 until such time that the total amount deposited into the fund during a fiscal year equals One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00).  On or before August 15, 2011, and each succeeding month thereafter, that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-23 that is derived from sales by cotton compresses or cotton warehouses and that would otherwise be paid into the General Fund shall be deposited into the special fund created under Section 69-37-39 until such time that the total amount deposited into the fund during a fiscal year equals One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00). (15)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before September 15, 2000, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of Section 27-65-19(1)(d)(i)2, and 27-65-19(1)(d)(i)3 shall be deposited, without diversion, into the Telecommunications Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-38-7. (16)  (a)  On or before August 15, 2000, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter on the gross proceeds of sales of a project as defined in Section 57-30-1 shall be deposited, after all diversions except the diversion provided for in subsection (1) of this section, into the Sales Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-30-3. (b)  On or before August 15, 2007, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighty percent (80%) of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter from the operation of a tourism project under the provisions of Sections 57-26-1 through 57-26-5, shall be deposited, after the diversions required in subsections (7) and (8) of this section, into the Tourism Project Sales Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-26-3. (17)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before April 15, 2002, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-23 on sales of parking services of parking garages and lots at airports shall be deposited, without diversion, into the special fund created under Section 27-5-101(d). (18)  [Repealed] (19)  (a)  On or before August 15, 2005, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter on the gross proceeds of sales of a business enterprise located within a redevelopment project area under the provisions of Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11, and the revenue collected on the gross proceeds of sales from sales made to a business enterprise located in a redevelopment project area under the provisions of Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11 (provided that such sales made to a business enterprise are made on the premises of the business enterprise), shall, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (19), be deposited, after all diversions, into the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund as created in Section 57-91-9. (b)  For a municipality participating in the Economic Redevelopment Act created in Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11, the diversion provided for in subsection (1) of this section attributable to the gross proceeds of sales of a business enterprise located within a redevelopment project area under the provisions of Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11, and attributable to the gross proceeds of sales from sales made to a business enterprise located in a redevelopment project area under the provisions of Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11 (provided that such sales made to a business enterprise are made on the premises of the business enterprise), shall be deposited into the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund as created in Section 57-91-9, as follows: (i)  For the first six (6) years in which payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, one hundred percent (100%) of the diversion shall be deposited into the fund; (ii)  For the seventh year in which such payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, eighty percent (80%) of the diversion shall be deposited into the fund; (iii)  For the eighth year in which such payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, seventy percent (70%) of the diversion shall be deposited into the fund; (iv)  For the ninth year in which such payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, sixty percent (60%) of the diversion shall be deposited into the fund; and (v)  For the tenth year in which such payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, fifty percent (50%) of the funds shall be deposited into the fund. (20)  On or before January 15, 2007, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighty percent (80%) of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter from the operation of a tourism project under the provisions of Sections 57-28-1 through 57-28-5 shall be deposited, after the diversions required in subsections (7) and (8) of this section, into the Tourism Sales Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-28-3. (21)  (a)  On or before April 15, 2007, and each succeeding month thereafter through June 15, 2013, One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited into the MMEIA Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-101-3. (b)  On or before July 15, 2013, and each succeeding month thereafter, One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited into the Mississippi Development Authority Job Training Grant Fund created in Section 57-1-451. (22)  On or before June 1, 2024, and each succeeding month thereafter until December 31, 2057, an amount determined annually by the Mississippi Development Authority of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited into the MMEIA Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-125-3.  This amount shall be based on estimated payments due within the upcoming year to construction contractors pursuant to construction contracts subject to the tax imposed by Section 27-65-21 for construction to be performed on the project site of a project defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii) for the coming year. (23)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before August 15, 2009, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of Section 27-65-201 shall be deposited, without diversion, into the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-51-105. (24)  (a)  On or before August 15, 2019, and each month thereafter through July 15, 2020, one percent (1%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month from restaurants and hotels shall be allocated for distribution to the Mississippi Development Authority Tourism Advertising Fund established under Section 57-1-64, to be used exclusively for the purpose stated therein.  On or before August 15, 2020, and each month thereafter through July 15, 2021, two percent (2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month from restaurants and hotels shall be allocated for distribution to the Mississippi Development Authority Tourism Advertising Fund established under Section 57-1-64, to be used exclusively for the purpose stated therein.  On or before August 15, 2021, and each month thereafter, three percent (3%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month from restaurants and hotels shall be allocated for distribution to the Mississippi Development Authority Tourism Advertising Fund established under Section 57-1-64, to be used exclusively for the purpose stated therein.  The revenue diverted pursuant to this subsection shall not be available for expenditure until February 1, 2020. (b)  The Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) must provide an annual report to the Legislature indicating the amount of funds deposited into the Mississippi Development Authority Tourism Advertising Fund established under Section 57-1-64, and a detailed record of how the funds are spent. (25)  The remainder of the amounts collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund. (26)  (a)  It shall be the duty of the municipal officials of any municipality that expands its limits, or of any community that incorporates as a municipality, to notify the commissioner of that action thirty (30) days before the effective date. Failure to so notify the commissioner shall cause the municipality to forfeit the revenue that it would have been entitled to receive during this period of time when the commissioner had no knowledge of the action. (b)  (i)  Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, if any funds have been erroneously disbursed to any municipality or any overpayment of tax is recovered by the taxpayer, the commissioner may make correction and adjust the error or overpayment with the municipality by withholding the necessary funds from any later payment to be made to the municipality. (ii)  Subject to the provisions of Sections 27-65-51 and 27-65-53, if any funds have been erroneously disbursed to a municipality under subsection (1) of this section for a period of three (3) years or more, the maximum amount that may be recovered or withheld from the municipality is the total amount of funds erroneously disbursed for a period of three (3) years beginning with the date of the first erroneous disbursement.  However, if during such period, a municipality provides written notice to the Department of Revenue indicating the erroneous disbursement of funds, then the maximum amount that may be recovered or withheld from the municipality is the total amount of funds erroneously disbursed for a period of one (1) year beginning with the date of the first erroneous disbursement. SECTION 5.  Section 45-1-43, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-1-43. * * *  On or after January 1, 2005,  In addition to the requirements and penalties provided under Sections 1 and 2 of this act for county sheriffs' departments and municipal police departments concerning police pursuit policies, each state, county and local law enforcement agency that conducts emergency response and vehicular pursuits shall adopt written policies and training procedures that set forth the manner in which these operations shall be conducted.  Each law enforcement agency may create their own such policies or adopt an existing model.  All pursuit policies created or adopted by any law enforcement agency must address situations in which police pursuits cross over into other jurisdictions.  Law enforcement agencies which do not comply with the requirements of this provision are subject to the withholding of any state funding or state administered federal funding. SECTION 6.  Section 65-33-45, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 65-33-45.  Except as otherwise provided under Section 2 of this act, where any county issues or has heretofore issued its bonds under this chapter or any previous statutes of a similar character for protection of any highway, there shall be paid into the treasury of such county fifty percent (50%) of any license taxes which would otherwise be paid into the State Highway Fund collected by the state in such county on motor vehicles or drivers thereof, and fifty percent (50%) of any excise taxes levied and collected in such county by the state on gasoline which would otherwise be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Highway Fund, to meet the interest and annual sinking fund on such bonds.  Such funds shall be applied toward the liquidation of the interest and sinking fund accruing annually on such bonds, the other fifty percent (50%) to go into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Highway Commission, and, if such taxes in any year should be insufficient to cover such interest and sinking fund, the deficiency therein shall be supplied out of any other such funds collected by the state in such county and allotted by law to such county for road purposes.  Nothing herein shall be construed as a guarantee on the part of the state to pay the interest or principal on any bonds issued hereunder. This section shall not apply to the tax collected from registration fees and the sale of automobile tags. Of the surplus of such funds so paid into the treasuries of Harrison and Jackson Counties, the portions thereof hereinafter designated, to the extent necessary under the limitations hereinafter stated, shall be paid by Harrison and Jackson Counties to the State Highway Commission and shall be applied by said commission on the annual payments of principal of and interest on bonds to be issued by the State Bond Commission in an amount not to exceed Seven Million Dollars ($7,000,000.00), for the construction, by the State Highway Commission, of a four-lane highway bridge across the Bay of Biloxi, to form a part of United States Highway No. 90, to the extent that two-thirds (2/3) of the total cost of principal and interest on such bonds shall be paid out of such surplus funds of Harrison County, and one-third (1/3) out of such surplus funds of Jackson County. For the purpose of this section, such "surplus funds of Harrison County" shall be construed to be the amount paid to Harrison County under this section not pledged to the payment of principal and interest of bonds issued under this chapter, or any previous statutes of a similar character for the protection of any highway, and presently outstanding.  "Surplus funds of Jackson County" shall be construed to be the amount paid to Jackson County under this section not pledged to the payment of principal and interest of bonds issued under this chapter, or any previous statutes of a similar character for the protection of any highway, and presently outstanding, and remaining after payment of principal and interest on bonds now issued or authorized by an election by Jackson County in connection with its Bayou Casotte development project under the authority of Senate Bill No. 1265, Extraordinary Session of 1954, as amended by Senate Bill No. 1624 enacted at the Regular 1958 Session of the Mississippi Legislature. Annually, to the extent necessary to meet the annual requirements for the payment of principal of and interest on said bonds, Harrison County shall pay to the State Highway Commission not exceeding two-thirds (2/3) of its aforesaid annual surplus, as hereinabove defined; and, to the extent necessary and available, Jackson County shall annually pay to the State Highway Commission from such surplus funds an amount not exceeding one-third (1/3) of the annual requirements for bonds issued by the State Bond Commission, and such amounts as may be necessary to satisfy any deficiency in preceding annual payments required to be made under the provisions hereof. Surplus funds remaining to both Harrison and Jackson Counties, after making the payments above directed, may be pledged, used, and expended, in whole or part, for the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds issued and to be issued under the authority of Sections 59-9-1 through 59-9-83; however, unless and until so pledged all or any part of such surplus now or hereafter accumulated may be transferred by the board of supervisors to a fund designated the county port fund and shall be subject to expenditure by the county port authority or county development commission for the purposes and objects authorized by said sections.  All expenditures made by the county port authority or county development commission shall be audited by the county auditor, who shall annually report such expenditures to the board of supervisors. SECTION 7.  Section 99-3-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-3-13.  If a person * * * commit an commits a carjacking, murder, aggravated assault or robbery offense and * * * be offense and be is pursued by a sheriff or constable, and escapes from the county of the officer, the officer may pursue and apprehend him or her in any county only as authorized by Section 1 of this act and take him or her to the county in which the offense was committed; and in all cases an officer or other person having the lawful custody of a prisoner, passing through any county on his route, may lodge the prisoner in any jail for safekeeping, as circumstances require.  In like manner if a person commits an offense within the corporate limits of an incorporated municipality and * * * be is pursued by a marshal or any other municipal peace or police officer and shall escape from the municipality, such municipal peace or police officer may pursue and apprehend such offender to places without the corporate limits of the municipality and to any place within the State of Mississippi to which such person may flee and may return such person to the municipality in which such offense was committed. SECTION 8.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2025.